Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1535.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 51 O.S. 2021, Section 50, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 50. A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
“Personal Privacy Protection Act”.
B. As used in the Personal Privacy Protection Act:
1. “Personal affiliation information” means any list, record,
register, registry, roll, roster or other compilation of data of any
kind that directly or indirectly identifies a person as a member,
supporter, or volunteer of, or donor of financial or nonfinancial

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1535 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

supp ort to, any entity organized pursuant to Section 501(c) of the
United States Internal Revenue Code; and
2. “Public agency” means any state or local governmental unit,
however designated, including, but not limited to, the State of
Oklahoma; any department, agency, office, commission, board,
division or other entity of the State of Oklahoma this state,
including those created or established pursuant to constitutional
provisions; any political subdivision of the State of Oklahoma, this
state including, but not limited to, a county, city, township,
village, school district, community college district or any other
local governmental unit, agency, authority, council, board or
commission; or any state or local court, tribunal or other judicial
or quasi-judicial body.
C. A public agency shall not do any of the following:
1. Require any individual to provide the public agency with
personal affiliation information or otherwise compel the release of
personal affiliation information;
2. Require any entity organized pursuant to Section 501(c) of
the United States Internal Revenue Code to provide the state agency
or political subdivision with personal affiliation information or
otherwise compel the release of personal affiliation information;
3. Release, publicize or otherwise publicly disclose any
personal affiliation information in the possession of the public
agency; or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1535 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. Request or require a current or prospective contractor or
grantee with the public agency to provide the public agency with a
list of entities organized pursuant to Section 501(c) of the United
States Internal Revenue Code to which it has provided financial or
nonfinancial support.
D. Personal affiliation information is shall be exempt from the
disclosure requirements of the Oklahoma Open Records Act.
E. The Personal Privacy Protection Act shall not preclude any
of the following:
1. Any report or disclosure required by the Oklahoma Ethics
Commission prior to the effective date of this act November 1, 2020;
2. Any lawful warrant for personal affiliation information
issued by a court of competent jurisdiction;
3. Any A lawful request by the Attorney General for personal
affiliation information pursuant to a review, examination, or
investigation authorized by state law;
4. Disclosure by the Attorney General of personal affiliation
information in court pleadings and motions, as relevant evidence, or
in public communications related to a civil or criminal action;
5. A lawful request by the Attorney General for personal
affiliation information in discovery in a civil or criminal action;
6. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any lawful
request for discovery of personal affiliation information in
litigation if both of the following conditions are met:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1535 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. the requester demonstrates a compelling need for the
personal affiliation information requested by clear
and convincing evidence, and
b. the requester obtains a protective order barring
disclosure of personal affiliation information to any
person not directly involved in the litigation; or
4. Admission 7. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
admission of personal affiliation information as relevant evidence
before a court of competent jurisdiction. However, no court shall
publicly reveal disclose personal affiliation information absent a
specific finding of good cause; or
8. A lawful request for, or disclosure of, personal affiliation
information that is publicly or voluntarily disclosed by the person
or entity to which it relates.
F. Any person alleging a violation of the Personal Privacy
Protection Act may bring a civil action for appropriate injunctive
relief, damages, or both injunctive relief and damages. Damages
awarded pursuant to this section may include one of the following,
as appropriate:
1. A sum of money not less than Two Thousand Five Hundred
Dollars ($2,500.00) to compensate for injury or loss caused by each
violation of this act the Personal Privacy Protection Act; or


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1535 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. For an intentional violation of this act the Personal
Privacy Protection Act, a sum of money not to exceed three times the
sum described in paragraph 1 of this subsection.
G. A court, in rendering judgment in an action brought pursuant
to this section, may award all or a portion of the costs of
litigation, including reasonable attorney fees and witness fees, to
the complainant in the action if the court determines that the award
is appropriate.
H. A person who knowingly violates this act the Personal
Property Protection Act shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than
ninety (90) days or a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
February 17, 2026 - DO PASS








SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1535 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)